Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska58-838
Expenses; how paid; liability; limitation.

All expenses incurred in carrying out the Nebraska Educational, Health, Cultural, and Social Services Finance Authority Act shall be payable solely from funds provided under the act, and no liability or obligation shall be incurred by the authority beyond the extent to which money has been provided under the act.

Laws 1981, LB 321, § 35;

Laws 1993, LB 465, § 18;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-2935;

Laws 1995, LB 5, § 35;

R.S.1943, (2008), § 85-1735;

Laws 2013, LB170, § 38;

Laws 2019, LB224, § 21.